test/src/gt-norm-yamls/Pron-me_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 


  Pronoun - ме: # Personal Pronoun 'I / minä / я'
    ме+Pron+Pers+Sg1+Nom: ме
    ме+Pron+Pers+Sg1+Acc: менӧ
    ме+Pron+Pers+Sg1+Gen: [] # Placeholder only
    ме+Pron+Pers+Sg1+GenStem: менам
    ме+Pron+Pers+Sg1+GenStem+Gen: менамлӧн
    ме+Pron+Pers+Sg1+GenStem+Instr: [] # Placeholder only
    ме+Pron+Pers+Sg1+GenStem+Com: менамкӧд
    ме+Pron+Pers+Sg1+GenStem+Car: менамтӧг
    ме+Pron+Pers+Sg1+GenStem+Ine: [] # Placeholder only
    ме+Pron+Pers+Sg1+GenStem+Ela: менамысь
    ме+Pron+Pers+Sg1+GenStem+Ill: менамӧ
    ме+Pron+Pers+Sg1+GenStem+Egr: [] # Placeholder only
    ме+Pron+Pers+Sg1+GenStem+Ter: менамӧдз
    ме+Pron+Pers+Sg1+Dat: [мем. мен, менлы, меным]
    ме+Pron+Pers+Sg1+Instr: [] # Placeholder only
    ме+Pron+Pers+Sg1+Com: [] # Placeholder only
    ме+Pron+Pers+Sg1+Car: [] # Placeholder only
    ме+Pron+Pers+Sg1+Cns: [] # Placeholder only
    ме+Pron+Pers+Sg1+Ine: [] # Placeholder only
    ме+Pron+Pers+Sg1+Ela: [] # Placeholder only
    ме+Pron+Pers+Sg1+Ela+PxSg1: менсьым
    ме+Pron+Pers+Sg1+Ill: [] # Placeholder only
    ме+Pron+Pers+Sg1+Apr: [] # Placeholder only
    ме+Pron+Pers+Sg1+Egr: [] # Placeholder only
    ме+Pron+Pers+Sg1+Prl: [] # Placeholder only
    ме+Pron+Pers+Sg1+Tra: [] # Placeholder only
    ме+Pron+Pers+Sg1+Ter: [] # Placeholder only
